Utah statutes.
36-16a-107.   Ballot form -- Manner of voting.

The lieutenant governor shall ensure that a ballot containing an opinion question includes:

(1)  a number and ballot title;

(2)  the text of the opinion question; and

(3) (a)  the words "FOR" and "AGAINST," each word presented with an adjacent square in which the voter may indicate the voter's vote; or

(b)  all possible responses to the opinion question, each response presented with an adjacent square in which the voter may indicate the voter's vote.

